Alaska statutes. Title 27. Mining.
Article 2. Assays.

Sec. 27.05.080.
Public assay offices.

The department shall, for the purpose of aiding bona fide miners and prospectors and stimulating mineral discoveries, establish a public assay office. The department may adopt regulations and establish procedures considered necessary and expedient to carry out this section and AS

27.05.090

.

History.

(§ 47-3-131 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1970; am § 15 ch 93 SLA 1984)

Sec. 27.05.090.
Appointment of assayers; information and procedure.

The department shall appoint for each public assay office a competent person to make assays and analyses of Alaskan ores and minerals.
No charge shall be imposed for an assay or analysis.
When an assay and analysis are made, the person requesting them shall state upon forms furnished by the department: (1) the person’s permanent residence address; (2) a description, as precise as possible, of the location where the sample was taken; and (3) other information that the department by regulation may require that may be beneficial to evaluation of the state’s mineral resources. Information received and assay results shall be kept confidential for a period of two years. At the end of that period the information and results shall be open to public inspection and may be published by the department.

History.

(§ 47-3-132 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 70 SLA 1970)

Secs. 27.05.100 — 27.05.130.
Unlawful acts; penalties.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.]

Secs. 27.05.140 — 27.05.170.
Prospectors’ subsidies.
[Repealed, § 2 ch 51 SLA 1963.]

Secs. 27.05.180 — 27.05.210.
State equipment for prospectors.
[Repealed, § 16 ch 93 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 27.05.250.
Reclamation. [Repealed, § 3 ch 92 SLA 1990. For current law, see AS 27.19.]